first.lexc
Multichar_Symbols
+V +V_suff +Inf +V_td +1P +2P +3P +Sg +Pl +Form +Inform 
+ADJ +ADJ_suff 
+Def_Art +Ind_Art +No_Art +Def_Art_Suff +Ind_Art_Suff +No_Art_Suff
+Mas +Neu +Fem +Plu 
+Nom +Acc +Dat +Gen

! Lexicon containing lexical stems:
LEXICON Root
antwort V_td "Answer";
arbeit V_td "Work" ;
frag V "Ask" ;
glaub V "Believe" ;
leb V "Live" ;
lern V "Learn" ;
mach V "Make; Do" ;
red V_td "Speak" ;
sag V "Say" ;
spiel V "Play" ;

alt ADJ "Old" ;
billig ADJ "Cheap" ;
breit ADJ "Wide; broad";
lang ADJ "long" ;
schwer ADJ "heavy" ;
leicht ADJ "light" ;
dick ADJ "thick" ;
eng ADJ "narrow" ;
hell ADJ "bright" ;
naß ADJ "wet" ;

! Lexicon conatining POS tag only
LEXICON V
+V:V_suff ;

! Lexicon for regular endings
LEXICON V_suff
+Inf:en          # ;
+1P+Sg:e         # ;
+1P+Pl:en        # ;
+2P+Sg+Inform:st # ;
+2P+Sg+Form:en   # ;
+2P+Pl+Inform:t  # ;
+2P+Pl+Form:en   # ;
+3P+Sg:t         # ;
+3P+Pl:en        # ;

! Vowels ending in -t or -d
LEXICON V_td
+V+Inf:en           # ;
+V+1P+Sg:e          # ;
+V+1P+Pl:en         # ;
+V+2P+Sg+Inform:est # ;
+V+2P+Sg+Form:en    # ;
+V+2P+Pl+Inform:et  # ;
+V+2P+Pl+Form:en    # ;
+V+3P+Sg:et         # ;
+V+3P+Pl:en         # ;

LEXICON ADJ
+ADJ:ADJ_suff ;

LEXICON ADJ_suff
+Def_Art:Def_Art_Suff ;
+Ind_Art:Ind_Art_Suff ;
+No_Art:No_Art_Suff ;

LEXICON Def_Art_Suff
+Mas+Nom:e # ;
+Mas+Acc:en # ;
+Mas+Dat:en # ;
+Mas+Gen:en # ;

+Neu+Nom:e # ;
+Neu+Acc:e # ;
+Neu+Dat:en # ;
+Neu+Gen:en # ;

+Fem+Nom:e # ;
+Fem+Acc:e # ;
+Fem+Dat:en # ;
+Fem+Gen:en # ;

+Plu+Nom:en # ;
+Plu+Acc:en # ;
+Plu+Dat:en # ;
+Plu+Gen:en # ;

LEXICON Ind_Art_Suff
+Mas+Nom:er # ;
+Mas+Acc:en # ;
+Mas+Dat:en # ;
+Mas+Gen:en # ;

+Neu+Nom:es # ;
+Neu+Acc:es # ;
+Neu+Dat:en # ;
+Neu+Gen:es # ;

+Fem+Nom:e # ;
+Fem+Acc:e # ;
+Fem+Dat:en # ;
+Fem+Gen:en # ;

+Plu+Nom:e # ;
+Plu+Acc:e # ;
+Plu+Dat:en # ;
+Plu+Gen:er # ;

LEXICON No_Art_Suff
+Mas+Nom:er # ;
+Mas+Acc:en # ;
+Mas+Dat:em # ;
+Mas+Gen:en # ;

+Neu+Nom:es # ;
+Neu+Acc:es # ;
+Neu+Dat:em # ;
+Neu+Gen:en # ;

+Fem+Nom:e # ;
+Fem+Acc:e # ;
+Fem+Dat:er # ;
+Fem+Gen:er # ;

+Plu+Nom:e # ;
+Plu+Acc:e # ;
+Plu+Dat:en # ;
+Plu+Gen:er # ;
